District of Columbia statutes.
47-1067

Way of the Cross Church of Christ; lots 918, 7, 9, 11, 118, 119, 120, 121, 122, 123, 124, 125, 126, 800, 801, 861, 863, 865, 867, 869, and 871 in square 5730.

The real property located at square 5730, lots 918, 7, 9 , 11, 118, 119, 120, 121, 122, 123, 124, 125, 126, 800, 801, 861, 863, 865, 867, 869 , and 871 , shall be exempt from all taxation so long as the property is owned by the Way of the Cross Church of Christ and the property located on square 5730, lot 918 is used as the principal residence of the pastor of the church.

Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 1192(b), 52 DCR 7503
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 1192(b) of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).
Short title of subtitle X of title I of Law 16-33: Section 1191 of D.C. Law 16-33 provided that subtitle X of title I of the act may be cited as the Way of the Cross Church of Christ Real Property Tax Exemption and Equitable Real Property Tax Relief Act of 2005.